District of Columbia statutes.
44-1304

Disposition of moneys from Industrial Home School.

All moneys received at the Industrial Home School as income from sale of products and from payment of board or of instruction or otherwise shall be paid into the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the District of Columbia.

Feb. 25, 1929, 45 Stat. 1292, ch. 314
Traffic adjudication, criminal offenses, offenses contained in this chapter, see § 50-2302.02.
1981 Ed., § 32-704.
1973 Ed., § 32-504.